Washington statutes.
RCW 43.10.065

Employment of attorneys and employees to transact state's legal business.

The attorney general may employ or discharge attorneys and employees to transact for the state, its departments, officials, boards, commissions, and agencies, all business of a legal or quasi legal nature, except those declared by law to be the duty of the judge of any court, or the prosecuting attorney of any county.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.10.065. Prior: 1941 c 50 s 1, part; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 11034-3, part. Formerly RCW 43.10.060, part.]